Washington statutes.
RCW 39.52.050

"Corporate authorities" defined.

The words "corporate authorities", used in this chapter, shall be held to mean the county legislative authority, or the council or commission of the city or town.

[ 1984 c 186 s 38; 1895 c 170 s 6; RRS s 5623.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.